pt-BR: Aprovação para torneio de dardos: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Nenhuma; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Outra
el: Εγκρίσεις για χρήση σε τουρνουά dartboard: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Κανένα; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Άλλο
ro-RO: Aprobare plăci pentru darts pentru turnee: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Niciuna; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Altele
zh-TW: 飛鏢靶賽事認證: 英國飛鏢組織 (BDO); 無; 職業飛鏢聯盟 (PDC); 世界飛鏢聯盟 (WDF); 其他
ja: ダーツボードトーナメント承認: British Darts Organisation (BDO); なし; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); その他
hr-HR: Pikado turnir odobrenje: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Nema; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Ostalo
nb: Dartboard turnering godkjenning: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Ingen; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Annet
hu: Darttábla verseny jóváhagyás: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Nincs; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Egyéb
tr: Dart tahtası turnuva onayı: İngiliz Dart Organizasyonu (BDO); Yok; Profesyonel Dart Şirketi (PDC); Dünya Dart Federasyonu (WDF); Diğer
es: Aprobación para torneo de dardos: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Ninguno; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Otro
vi: Phê duyệt giải đấu phi tiêu: Tổ chức Phi tiêu Anh (BDO); Không; Tập đoàn Phi tiêu Chuyên nghiệp (PDC); Liên đoàn Phi tiêu Thế giới (WDF); Khác
sk-SK: Schválenie turnaja v šípkach: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Žiadne; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Iné
fr: Certification tournoi de cible de fléchettes: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Aucune; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Autre
ko: 다트보드 대회 승인: 영국 다트 기구(BDO); 없음; 프로 다트 협회(PDC); 세계 다트 연맹(WDF); 기타
pl: Zatwierdzenie tarczy do darta do turniejów: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Brak; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Inne
ru: Турнирное одобрение мишени для дартса: Британская организация дартса (BDO); Нет; Профессиональная корпорация дартса (PDC); Всемирная федерация дартса (WDF); Другое
nl: Goedkeuring dartbordtoernooi: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Geen; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Overige
da: Godkendelse af dartskive til turnering: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Ingen; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Andet
pt-PT: Aprovação do torneio de dardos: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Nenhum; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Outro
zh-CN: 飞镖盘赛事认证: 英国飞镖组织 (BDO); 无; 职业飞镖公司 (PDC); 世界飞镖联合会 (WDF); 其他
en: Dartboard tournament approval: British Darts Organisation (BDO); None; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Other
it: Approvazione del torneo di freccette: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Nessuna; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Altra
lt-LT: Smiginio lentos turnyrinis patvirtinimas: Britanijos smiginio organizacija (BDO); Nėra; Profesionalaus smiginio korporacija (PDC); Pasaulio smiginio federacija (WDF); Kita
sl-SI: Odobritev za turnir v pikadu: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Brez; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Drugo
fi: Tikkataulun turnaushyväksyntä: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Ei mikään; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Muu
th: การรับรองกระดานปาเป้าสำหรับการแข่งขันอย่างเป็นทางการ: British Darts Organisation (BDO); ไม่มี; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); อื่นๆ
cs: Schválení turnajového terče: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Žádné; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Jiné
sv: Tillstånd för darttavlaturnering: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Ingen; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Övrigt
de: Turnierzulassung für Dartscheiben: British Darts Organisation (BDO); Keine; Professional Darts Corporation (PDC); World Darts Federation (WDF); Sonstige
bg-BG: Одобрение за състезателна употреба на дартс мишена: Британска дартс организация (BDO); Няма; Професионална дартс корпорация (PDC); Световна дартс федерация (WDF); Други